debug.lexc
LEXICON NounPostbase1
0:0        NounInfl;
-~sf–ghhalek[how.N][N→XCLM]:~sf–ghhalek  #;

-e[N→N]:e                                NounPostbase2;
-~sf-w%:(e)nkuk[N→N]:~sf-w%:(e)nkuk      NounPostbase2; ! TODO: There is a discrepancy in Jacobson v. Badten regarding
-~sf-w%:(e)nkut[N→N]:~sf-w%:(e)nkut      NounPostbase2; !       the morphophonological processes of this postbase
-–ghhagh*[N→N]:–ghhagh*                  NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Used with C-ending bases only, ~fngiighhagh* with V-ending bases
-~fngiighhagh*[N→N]:~fngiighhagh*        NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Used with V-ending bases only, ghhagh* with C-ending bases
-–ghllag[N→N]:–ghllag                    NounPostbase2;
-–ghnaggagh*[N→N]:–ghnaggagh*            NounPostbase2;
-–ghrugllag[N→N]:–ghrugllag              NounPostbase2;
-–ghrug[N→N]:–ghrug                      NounPostbase2;
-–ghrukutaaghllag[N→N]:–ghrukutaaghllag  NounPostbase2;
-–ghrukutaagh[N→N]:–ghrukutaagh          NounPostbase2;
-–ghrupag[N→N]:–ghrupag                  NounPostbase2;
-@₁kaghagh[N→N]:@₁kaghagh                NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Used with -te nouns only
-~–kaghqagh[N→N]:~–kaghqagh              NounPostbase2;
-kagh[N→N]:kagh                          NounPostbase2;
-~–kegtagh[N→N]:~–kegtagh                NounPostbase2;
-~–kenghhagh*[N→N]:~–kenghhagh*          NounPostbase2;
-–krag[N→N]:–krag                        NounPostbase2;
-–kuvinghagh[N→N]:–kuvinghagh            NounPostbase2;
-kwaagh[N→N]:kwaagh                      NounPostbase2;
-–leg[N→N]:–leg                          NounPostbase2;
-–lghun[N→N]:–lghun                      NounPostbase2;
-–lghutagh[N→N]:–lghutagh                NounPostbase2;
-–lgun[N→N]:–lgun                        NounPostbase2;
-–linghagh*[N→N]:–linghagh*              NounPostbase2;
-–llaag[N→N]:–llaag                      NounPostbase2;
-–llegagh*[N→N]:–llegagh*                NounPostbase2;
-–llgagh[N→N]:–llgagh                    NounPostbase2;
-lluggagh[N→N]:lluggagh                  NounPostbase2;
-–lluggagh[N→N]:–lluggagh                NounPostbase2;
-llug[N→N]:llug                          NounPostbase2;
-–llug[N→N]:–llug                        NounPostbase2;
-–lugpigagh[N→N]:–lugpigagh              NounPostbase2;
-–lug[N→N]:–lug                          NounPostbase2;
-~fmii[N→N]:~fmii                        NounPostbase2;
-~fmig[N→N]:~fmig                        NounPostbase2;
-~fmiigh[N→N]:~fmiigh                    NounPostbase2;
-–mlaagh[N→N]:–mlaagh                    NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Are there no conditions on the following postbases
-–mraagh[N→N]:–mraagh                    NounPostbase2;         which are documented as identical?
-–mzaagh[N→N]:–mzaagh                    NounPostbase2;
-–mleghagh[N→N]:–mleghagh                NounPostbase2;         Badten also does not provide example words
-–mreghagh[N→N]:–mreghagh                NounPostbase2;         containing these postbases. 
-–mzeghagh[N→N]:–mzeghagh                NounPostbase2;
-–vlaagh[N→N]:–vlaagh                    NounPostbase2;
-–vleghagh[N→N]:–vleghagh                NounPostbase2;
-–vraagh[N→N]:–vraagh                    NounPostbase2;
-–vreghagh[N→N]:–vreghagh                NounPostbase2;
-–vzaagh[N→N]:–vzaagh                    NounPostbase2;
-–vzeghagh[N→N]:–vzeghagh                NounPostbase2;         End.
-–msiigh[N→N]:–msiigh                    NounPostbase2;
-–msuggagh*[N→N]:–msuggagh*              NounPostbase2;
-–ngeltagh[N→N]:–ngeltagh                NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Are there no conditions on the following postbases which are
-–ngertagh[N→N]:–ngertagh                NounPostbase2; !       documented as identical?
-–ngestagh[N→N]:–ngestagh                NounPostbase2; !       End.
-~%:(ng₁)inagh*[N→N]:~%:(ng₁)inagh*      NounPostbase2;
-~%:(ng₁)iitagh[N→N]:~%:(ng₁)iitagh      NounPostbase2;
-ni[N→N]:ni                              NounPostbase2;
-nite[N→N]:nite                          NounPostbase2;
-~f(p/v)allugh[N→N]:~f(p/v)allugh        NounPostbase2;
-–penaagh[N→N]:–penaagh                  NounPostbase2;
-–peragh[N→N]:–peragh                    NounPostbase2;
-–perewaagh[N→N]:–perewaagh              NounPostbase2;
-–perug[N→N]:–perug                      NounPostbase2;
-–pestaagh[N→N]:–pestaagh                NounPostbase2;
-–pig[N→N]:–pig                          NounPostbase2;
-qagh[N→N]:qagh                          NounPostbase2;
-–qinghagh[N→N]:–qinghagh                NounPostbase2;
-–qligh*[N→N]:–qligh*                    NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Used with positional bases
-–qragh[N→N]:–qragh                      NounPostbase2;
-–qrug[N→N]:–qrug                        NounPostbase2;
-qutagh[N→N]:qutagh                      NounPostbase2;
-raghagh[N→N]:raghagh                    NounPostbase2;
-raaghagh[N→N]:raaghagh                  NounPostbase2;
-–raaghinagh*[N→N]:–raaghinagh*          NounPostbase2;
-raag[N→N]:raag                          NounPostbase2;
-–raagh[N→N]:–raagh                      NounPostbase2;
-–rraag[N→N]:–rraag                      NounPostbase2;
-–siigh[N→N]:–siigh                      NounPostbase2;
-–sluvegagh[N→N]:–sluvegagh              NounPostbase2;
-–sngwaaghaq[N→N]:–sngwaaghaq            NounPostbase2;
-–squghhagh*[N→N]:–squghhagh*            NounPostbase2;
-–squllgagh[N→N]:–squllgagh              NounPostbase2;
-–squgh[N→N]:–squgh                      NounPostbase2;
-–staghhiinagh*[N→N]:–staghhiinagh*      NounPostbase2;
-tagh[N→N]:tagh                          NounPostbase2;
-tuqagh[N→N]:tuqagh                      NounPostbase2;
-–tuqagh[N→N]:–tuqagh                    NounPostbase2;
-–vyiigh[N→N]:–vyiigh                    NounPostbase2; ! TODO: Are there no conditions on the following postbases which are
-–vziigh[N→N]:–vziigh                    NounPostbase2;         documented as identical?
-yage[N→N]:yage                          NounPostbase2;
-–yaagh[N→N]:–yaagh                      NounPostbase2;

-–ghqu[N→V]:–ghqu                        VerbIntr2;
-–ghqu[N→V]:–ghqu                        VerbTrns2;
-–ghraag[N→V]:–ghraag                    VerbIntr2;
-–ghraag[N→V]:–ghraag                    VerbTrns2;
-–ghrug[N→V]:–ghrug                      VerbIntr2;
-–ghrug[N→V]:–ghrug                      VerbTrns2;
-––ii[N→V]:––ii                          VerbIntr2;
-––ii[N→V]:––ii                          VerbTrns2;
-––igh[N→V]:––igh                        VerbIntr2;
-––igh[N→V]:––igh                        VerbTrns2;
-––iigh[N→V]:––iigh                      VerbIntr2;
-––iigh[N→V]:––iigh                      VerbTrns2;
-––iqe[N→V]:––iqe                        VerbIntr2;
-––iqe[N→V]:––iqe                        VerbTrns2;
-iiraagh[N→V]:iiraagh                    VerbIntr2;
-iiraagh[N→V]:iiraagh                    VerbTrns2;
-~–kaghte[N→V]:~–kaghte                  VerbIntr2; ! TODO: Used with nouns concerning games, money, etc.
!-~–kaghte[N→V]:~–kaghte                 VerbTrns2; ! TODO: Used with nouns concerning games, money, etc.
-~–kegte[N→V]:~–kegte                    VerbIntr2;
-~–kegte[N→V]:~–kegte                    VerbTrns2;
-~–ke[N→V]:~–ke                          VerbIntr2;
-~–ke[N→V]:~–ke                          VerbTrns2;
-–ksagute[N→V]:–ksagute                  VerbIntr2;
-–ksagute[N→V]:–ksagute                  VerbTrns2;
-–lgigh[N→V]:–lgigh                      VerbIntr2;
-–lgigh[N→V]:–lgigh                      VerbTrns2;
-–lgu[N→V]:–lgu                          VerbIntr2;
-–lgu[N→V]:–lgu                          VerbTrns2;
-–ligh[N→V]:–ligh                        VerbIntr2;
-–ligh[N→V]:–ligh                        VerbTrns2;
-–liigh[N→V]:–liigh                      VerbIntr2;
-–liigh[N→V]:–liigh                      VerbTrns2;
-–lipag[N→V]:–lipag                      VerbIntr2;
-–lipag[N→V]:–lipag                      VerbTrns2;
-–liqe[N→V]:–liqe                        VerbIntr2;
-–liqe[N→V]:–liqe                        VerbTrns2;
-–liite[N→V]:–liite                      VerbIntr2;

LEXICON NounBase
aawhkaghniimna         	NounPostbase1; ! previous place; former one
aghneghet              	NounPostbase1; ! dawn; dusk; twilight
aghveqaghtaateg        	NounPostbase1; ! bolas
aklighyaget            	NounPostbase1; ! highest level of the atmosphere
ali                    	NounPostbase1; ! out of sight
amigh                  	NounPostbase1; ! skin (especially of an animal)
angalqatagh            	NounPostbase1; ! white wagtail (Motacilla alba); hook for retrieving seals or birds; sling for hunting
Angyat                 	NounPostbase1; ! Vngyat Pt. on St. Lawrence Is.
aqelqagh               	NounPostbase1; ! guest, visitor
asivagh                	NounPostbase1; ! east; wind from east
avayagh                	NounPostbase1; ! branch; prong on reindeer antler
ayaviigh               	NounPostbase1; ! walking stick; cane
egllug         	        NounPostbase1; ! stove
eslevag                	NounPostbase1; ! roe; fish egg; vagina
ggute                  	NounPostbase1; ! tooth
ighigh                 	NounPostbase1; ! tilting (especially one's head)
iighhaata              	NounPostbase1; ! loop of walrus hide
iki                    	NounPostbase1; ! impossible!; in no circumstances
imugh                  	NounPostbase1; ! on the verge of crying; tearful
iqeghutagh             	NounPostbase1; ! rope used to tether a dead walrus
iyeksag                	NounPostbase1; ! starfish
kalefkagnagh 	        NounPostbase1; ! snow into which sled runners can sink while traveling
kapeqengeltagh         	NounPostbase1; ! dotted material; paresthesia ("pins and needles" feeling in flesh)
kellighinagh*          	NounPostbase1; ! open water between ice in the ocean; polynya
Ketliqagh              	NounPostbase1; ! Kookoolik Cape on St. Lawrence Is.
kingumegta             	NounPostbase1; ! last whale migrating in a particular season
kuruwiigh    	        NounPostbase1; ! ivory gull (Pagophila eburnea)
liisagh                	NounPostbase1; ! something (especially food) put aside for someone
maklagu                	NounPostbase1; ! intestines of bearded seal
maqagh                 	NounPostbase1; ! warmth (of clothes, dwelling, etc.); warm clothes; light and loose fitting snowjacket made from thin skin of young reindeer
melugyagh              	NounPostbase1; ! jellyfish
mingllute              	NounPostbase1; ! wall; fence; boundary
naflugh                	NounPostbase1; ! joint; hinge; crack in ice
nangaghnegh            	NounPostbase1; ! way of life; culture; personality; behavior; form; lore
Nayghwaagh             	NounPostbase1; ! Mugum Peak on St. Lawrence Is.
nengleg                	NounPostbase1; ! coldness
ngilvil                	NounPostbase1; ! herd; flock
Nunivagem Angliviga    	NounPostbase1; ! August
paaypele              	NounPostbase1; ! bible
paseragh               	NounPostbase1; ! edible root type
penniighniighta        	NounPostbase1; ! shepherd
Pingayaa aghnegh       	NounPostbase1; ! Tuesday
Qaaramka               	NounPostbase1; ! a particular clan; Even (ethnic group)
qantaqusigh            	NounPostbase1; ! pouch, often for tobacco, worn on belt
Qenipagilghat          	NounPostbase1; ! Kinipaghulghat Mtns. on St. Lawrence Is.
Qiwaa                   NounPostbase1; ! Kivak, former village in Chukotka
quyngighqwaaghta       	NounPostbase1; ! reindeer herder
saniquute              	NounPostbase1; ! centerboard for boat
siirgusiigh            	NounPostbase1; ! scrambled eggs
sullevnegh             	NounPostbase1; ! mischievous person; one who hurts others through sorcery; inconsiderate person
Tallimaa aghnegh       	NounPostbase1; ! Thursday
tekeleg                	NounPostbase1; ! one who sews a lot; talented sewer
tum                    	NounPostbase1; ! bang
ugutelnge             	NounPostbase1; ! chain
Uqeghlliit             	NounPostbase1; ! the people of Sireniki in Chukotka
uyiighagh              	NounPostbase1; ! rope made from hide from a bearded seal
yukuta                 	NounPostbase1; ! dampness; moisture; fog; mist
